District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Avanti Real Estate Services, LLC Real Property Tax Relief Temporary
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Chief Financial Officer may forgive up to $377,000 in
real property taxes, interest, penalties, fees, and other related charges assessed, as of the effective
date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2025, effective September 3,
2025 (D.C. Act 26-146; 72 DCR 9623), against the real property designated for tax purposes as
Lot 123, Square 2836, located at 3421 14th Street, NW, (“Property”), which is owned by Avanti
Real Estate Services, LLC; provided, that the Property is occupied by Avanti Real Estate
Services, LLC and is used to further the purposes of providing real estate and brokerage services,
specializing in creating generational wealth through homeownership, employing District
residents, and providing education and training for employment opportunities and careers within
the real estate industry.
(b) The Council further orders that all tax sales of the Property conducted under Chapter
13A of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code to collect delinquencies forgiven by
subsection (a) of this section shall be cancelled pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1366.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2